Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
SPECIAL MANAGEMENT AREAS

Note

Part heading amended by L 1979, c 200, §6.

§205A-21 Findings and purposes. The
legislature finds that, special controls on developments within an area along
the shoreline are necessary to avoid permanent losses of valuable resources and
the foreclosure of management options, and to ensure that adequate access, by
dedication or other means, to public owned or used beaches, recreation areas,
and natural reserves is provided. The legislature finds and declares that it
is the state policy to preserve, protect, and where possible, to restore the
natural resources of the coastal zone of Hawaii. [L 1975, c 176, pt of §1; am L
1977, c 188, §5]

Law Journals and Reviews

The Protection of Individual Rights Under Hawai`i's
Constitution. 14 UH L. Rev. 311.

Ala Loop and the Private Right of Action Under Hawai`i
Constitution Article XI, Section 9: Charting a Path Toward a Cohesive
Enforcement Scheme. 33 UH L. Rev. 367 (2010).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next